Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 8. Family College Savings Program

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities §§ 2, 39, 40.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities § 33.

§§ 21-16-801 through 21-16-808.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 71, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see §

21-16-809

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which were derived from Laws 1999, ch. 143, § 1, related to the establishment of a family college savings program.

§ 21-16-809.
Legislative declaration. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 71, § 1; 2006, ch. 46, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 135, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 21-16-811.
Wyoming family college savings program trust. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 71, § 1; 2006, ch. 46, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 135, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 21-16-812.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 46, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from
Laws 2000, ch. 71, § 1, related to the committee's recommendation for approval of account holders and managers of programs.

Laws 2006, ch. 46, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

§ 21-16-813.
General powers of treasurer. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 71, § 1; 2006, ch. 46, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 135, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 21-16-814.
Financial institutions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 71, § 1; 2006, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; repealed by 2019 ch. 135, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 21-16-815.
Program requirements. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 71, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 6, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 46, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 135, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 21-16-816.
Limitations. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 71, § 1; 2006, ch. 46, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 135, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 21-16-817.
Limitations on liability. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 71, § 1; 2006, ch. 46, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 135, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 21-16-818.
Residency. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 71, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 135, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.